Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 4. City Powers.

Sec. 29.35.250.
Cities inside boroughs.

A city inside a borough may exercise any power not otherwise prohibited by law.

On adoption of a borough ordinance to provide for areawide exercise of a power, no city may exercise the power unless the borough ordinance provides otherwise or the borough by ordinance ceases to exercise the power.

A home rule city in a third class borough shall provide for planning, platting, and land use regulation as provided by AS

29.35.180(b)

for home rule boroughs. A first class city in a third class borough shall provide for planning, platting, and land use regulation as provided by AS

29.35.180(a)

for first and second class boroughs. A second class city in a third class borough may provide for planning, platting, and land use regulation as provided by AS

29.35.180(a)

for first and second class boroughs.

This section applies to home rule and general law cities.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.35.260.
Cities outside boroughs.

A city outside a borough may exercise a power not otherwise prohibited by law. A provision that is incorporated by reference to laws governing boroughs applies to home rule cities outside boroughs only if the provision is made applicable to home rule boroughs.

A home rule or first class city outside a borough is a city school district and shall establish, operate, and maintain a system of public schools as provided by AS

29.35.160

for boroughs. A second class city outside a borough is not a school district and may not establish a system of public schools.

A home rule city outside a borough shall provide for planning, platting, and land use regulation as provided by AS

29.35.180(b)

for home rule boroughs. A first class city outside a borough shall, and a second class city outside a borough may, provide for planning, platting, and land use regulation as provided by AS

29.35.180(a)

for first and second class boroughs.

This section applies to home rule and general law cities.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)